Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-7-120.
Reduction of benefits upon determination that available moneys are insufficient; liability of members of the board for such reductions.

If the moneys provided by this chapter are not sufficient at any time to enable the board to pay each person his benefits in full under this chapter, then those persons entitled to benefits shall be paid an equal amount, which, in the opinion of the board, the fund may provide. In no such event shall the board or any member of the board be liable to any beneficiary for any deficiencies in payments under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-7-121.
Vesting of rights to benefits.

Benefits under this chapter shall be subject to future legislative change and revision and no member of this fund or any other persons shall be deemed to have any vested right to any benefits, except as may be provided in Code Section 47-7-100.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 10; Ga. L. 1976, p. 241, § 5.

47-7-122.
Exemption of benefits under this chapter from garnishment, attachment, or other process; exemption from taxation; assignment of such benefits.

Benefits under this chapter shall not be subject to attachment, garnishment, levy, or other legal process against the firefighter, volunteer firefighter, or a designated beneficiary entitled to receive such benefits; nor shall such benefits or rights be assignable unless specifically provided for in this chapter. Benefits under this chapter are expressly declared to be exempt from any and all taxation, whether imposed by any state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 339, § 12; Ga. L. 1962, p. 550, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1.

47-7-123.
Exemption of assets of the board from taxation.

The assets of the board, whether in the form of cash, securities, or real property, shall be deemed to be public property and exempt from any and all taxation, whether imposed by the state, or by any county, municipality, or political subdivision of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 338, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1.

47-7-124.
Disposition of funds abandoned by members separated from the service; notice; limitation on asserting certain claims; venue.

No claim shall be made against the fund for benefits or the return of contributions after the lapse of seven years from the date on which the executive director of the fund shall have mailed by first-class mail to the last known address of the firefighter or volunteer firefighter or other person eligible therefor, as such address is reflected by the records of the fund, a written notice that the firefighter or volunteer firefighter or other eligible person is or may be eligible for such benefits or return of contributions; and, in the event any claim for benefits or the return of contributions is barred in accordance with this subsection, the amounts thereof shall be the property of the Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund. The bar period prescribed by this subsection shall not begin to run with respect to a firefighter or volunteer firefighter on leave of absence who has elected to leave his or her contributions in the fund until the failure of the firefighter or volunteer firefighter to provide written confirmation of his or her election to remain on leave of absence within 60 days of a not more frequent than biennial request for such confirmation mailed to the last known address of such firefighter or volunteer firefighter, as such address is reflected by the records of the fund.

No action shall be brought contesting any determination of the board with respect to eligibility for membership or continued membership in the fund, creditable service, eligibility for retirement or disability benefits, the amount of retirement or disability benefits payable, or the termination or suspension of retirement or disability benefits after the expiration of 60 days from the date on which written notice of the final determination of the board is mailed by first-class mail to the last known address of the firefighter or volunteer firefighter or of the designated representative thereof, as such address is reflected on the records of the fund; and no court shall have jurisdiction of any action brought after the expiration of such period. The written notice provided for in this subsection shall contain notice of the limitation established by this subsection.

Any other provision of law notwithstanding, no action shall be brought or claim asserted by the board of trustees or on its behalf after April 1, 1989, against any person on account of the payment during the period July 1, 1984, through June 30, 1988, to any person otherwise eligible to receive disability benefits (hereinafter “disability retiree”) of an amount in excess of the disability benefits to which such disability retiree was lawfully entitled where such excess payment resulted from the erroneous determination by the board of trustees of the maximum monthly disability benefit payable to such disability retiree. After April 1, 1989, any such claim described in the foregoing sentence shall be forever barred.

The venue for actions arising under this chapter brought against the board or the fund in superior court, including, but not limited to, a judicial review of a final decision of the board, shall be in the superior court of the county of domicile of the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-124

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1310, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 50, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1376, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 438, § 8/HB 1150; Ga. L. 2016, p. 434, § 2/HB 844.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (a), substituted “executive director” for “secretary-treasurer” near the beginning of the first sentence and inserted “or her” twice in the second sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1989, p. 50, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Pursuant to the authority of Code Section 47-20-63 [repealed], this Act is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law,’ and pursuant to the former provisions of said Code Section 47-20-63 the General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) It is necessary for this Act to become effective without delay in order to avoid hardship to members and retired members of the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund;

“(2) The Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund is actuarially sound; and

“(3) That the changes in Chapter 7 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated providing for the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund which are accomplished by this Act will be fully financed by the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund without the necessity of any appropriation by the General Assembly and without adversely affecting the actuarial soundness of the Georgia Firemen’s Pension Fund.”

47-7-125.
Availability of records of local departments to board; confidentiality.

Upon request, an authorized representative of the board shall have the power to inspect and copy or make extracts from the records of any fire department or volunteer fire department concerning any member of the fund or applicant for membership. It shall be the duty of the custodian of such records for the fire department or volunteer fire department to make such records available to an authorized representative of the board at the location at which such records are normally kept. Information so obtained by the board shall not be disclosed by the board except in connection with a matter involving the member or applicant for membership to whom the records relate.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-125

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1310, § 5.

47-7-126.
Penalty for false statements or falsified records; correction of errors by the board.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the fund in an attempt to defraud the fund shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $2,000.00, imprisonment for up to 12 months, or both.

On and after July 1, 2015, if the board finds, after notice and opportunity for a hearing conducted in accordance with the procedure for contested cases under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” that any person on or after July 1, 2015, has knowingly:

Made a material false statement or falsified or permitted to be falsified any records of the fund or documents of the fund in an attempt to defraud the fund;

Obtained or continued membership in the fund while not eligible to become or remain a member of the fund;

Obtained benefits that he or she is not entitled to receive; or

Obtained benefits in an amount greater than he or she is entitled to receive,

the board may order that such person shall forfeit all rights and benefits that he or she may be entitled to under the fund. Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by a final action of the board under this subsection shall have the right of judicial review in the superior courts.

If any change or error in the records of the fund results in any member or beneficiary receiving from it more or less than such member or beneficiary would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as is practicable and in such manner that the actuarial equivalent of any additional benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid or in such manner that any excess payment shall be recovered.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-126

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 755, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 12/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subsection (a), inserted “of a high and aggravated nature” and substituted “$2,000.00” for “$500.00”; added present subsection (b); and redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c).

47-7-127.
[Repealed] “Alternative investments” defined; code of ethics.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-7-127

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 415, § 1/HB 249; Ga. L. 2022, p. 287, § 1/HB 1056, effective May 2, 2022.